North Carolina statutes. Chapter 162A. Water and Sewer Systems.
Article 1. Water and Sewer Authorities.

§ 162A-1.
Title.

This Article shall be known and may be cited as the “North Carolina Water and Sewer Authorities Act.”

History.

1955, c. 1195, s. 1; 1971, c. 892, s. 1.

Funds for Local Government Water and Sewer Improvement Grants.

Session Laws 2007-323, s. 13.13A, provides for the use of certain funds appropriated to the Rural Economic Development Center, Inc. for the 2007-2008 fiscal year for wastewater-related and public water system-related projects. See note at

G.S. 160A-311

.

§ 162A-2.
Definitions.

As used in this Article the following words and terms shall have the following meanings, unless the context shall indicate another or different meaning or intent:

The word “authority” shall mean an authority created under the provisions of this Article or, if such authority shall be abolished, the board, body or commission succeeding to the principal functions thereof or to whom the powers given by this Article to the authority shall be given by law.

The word “Commission” shall mean the Environmental Management Commission.

The word “cost” as applied to a water system or a sewer system shall include the purchase price of any such system, the cost of construction, the cost of all labor and materials, machinery and equipment, the cost of improvements, the cost of all lands, property, rights, easements and franchises acquired, financing charges, interest prior to and during construction and, if deemed advisable by the authority, for one year after completion of construction, cost of plans and specifications, surveys and estimates of cost and of revenues, cost of engineering and legal services, and all other expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of such construction, administrative expense and such other expenses, including reasonable provision for working capital, as may be necessary or incident to the financing herein authorized. Any obligation or expense incurred by the authority or by any political subdivision prior to the issuance of bonds under the provisions of this Article in connection with any of the foregoing items or cost may be regarded as a part of such cost.

The term “governing body” shall mean the board, commission, council or other body, by whatever name it may be known, in which the general legislative powers of the political subdivision are vested.

The word “improvements” shall mean such repairs, replacements, additions, extensions and betterments of and to a water system or a sewer system as are deemed necessary by the authority to place or to maintain such system in proper condition for its safe, efficient and economic operation or to meet requirements for service in areas which may be served by the authority and for which no existing service is being rendered.

The word “person” shall mean any and all persons, including individuals, firms, partnerships, associations, public or private institutions, municipalities, or political subdivisions, governmental agencies, or private or public corporations organized and existing under the laws of this State or any other state or country.

The term “political subdivision” shall mean any county, city, town, incorporated village, sanitary district or other political subdivision or public corporation of this State now or hereafter incorporated.

(7a)

The word “revenues” shall mean all moneys received by an authority from or in connection with any sewer system or water system including, without limitation, any moneys received as interest grants.

The word “sewage” shall mean the water-carried wastes created in and carried or to be carried away from residences, hotels, schools, hospitals, industrial establishments, commercial establishments or any other private or public building together with such surface or groundwater or household and industrial wastes as may be present.

The term “sewage disposal system” shall mean and shall include any plant, system, facility, or property used or useful or having the present capacity for future use in connection with the collection, treatment, purification or disposal of sewage (including industrial wastes resulting from any processes of industry, manufacture, trade or business or from the development of any natural resources), or any integral part thereof, including but not limited to septic tank systems or other on-site collection or disposal facilities or systems, treatment plants, pumping stations, intercepting sewers, trunk sewers, pressure lines, mains and all necessary appurtenances and equipment, and all property, rights, easements and franchises relating thereto and deemed necessary or convenient by the authority for the operation thereof.

The word “sewers” shall include mains, pipes and laterals for the reception of sewage and carrying such sewage to an outfall or some part of a sewage disposal system, including pumping stations where deemed necessary by the authority.

The term “sewer system” shall embrace both sewers and sewage disposal systems and all property, rights, easements and franchises relating thereto.

The term “water system” shall mean and include all plants, systems, facilities or properties used or useful or having the present capacity for future use in connection with the supply or distribution of water or the control and drainage of stormwater runoff and any integral part thereof, including but not limited to water supply systems, water distribution systems, stormwater management programs designed to protect water quality by controlling the level of pollutants in, and the quantity and flow of, stormwater and structural and natural stormwater and drainage systems of all types, sources of water supply including lakes, reservoirs and wells, intakes, mains, laterals, aqueducts, pumping stations, standpipes, filtration plants, purification plants, hydrants, meters, valves, and all necessary appurtenances and equipment and all properties, rights, easements and franchises relating thereto and deemed necessary or convenient by the authority for the operation thereof.

History.

1955, c. 1195, s. 2; 1969, c. 850; 1971, c. 892, s. 1; 1979, c. 619, s. 8; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1004, s. 43; 1991, c. 591, s. 3; 2000-70, s. 5.

Cross References.

As to provisions for the temporary implementation of federal Phase II Stormwater Management requirements, see Session Laws 2004-163, noted under

G.S. 143-214.7

.

§ 162A-3.
Procedure for creation; certificate of incorporation; certification of principal office and officers.

The governing body of a single county or the governing bodies of any two or more political subdivisions may by resolution signify their determination to organize an authority under the provisions of this Article. Each of such resolutions shall be adopted after a public hearing thereon, notice of which hearing shall be given by publication at least once, not less than 10 days prior to the date fixed for such hearing, in a newspaper having a general circulation in the political subdivision. Such notice shall contain a brief statement of the substance of the proposed resolution, shall set forth the proposed articles of incorporation of the authority and shall state the time and place of the public hearing to be held thereof. No such political subdivision shall be required to make any other publication of such resolution under the provisions of any other law.

(a1)

If an authority is organized by three or more political subdivisions, it may include in its organization nonprofit water corporations. The board of directors of a nonprofit water corporation must signify the corporation’s determination to participate in the organization of the authority by adopting a resolution that meets the requirements of subsection (b) of this section. The nonprofit water corporation is not subject to the notice and public hearing requirements of subsection (a) of this section. For all other purposes of this Article, the nonprofit water corporation shall be considered to be a political subdivision.

(a2)

If an authority is organized by three or more political subdivisions, it may include in its organization the State of North Carolina. The State of North Carolina is not subject to the notice and public hearing requirements of subsection (a) of this section. For purposes of this Article, the State of North Carolina shall be a political subdivision and its governing body shall be the Council of State.

Each such resolution shall include articles of incorporation which shall set forth:

The name of the authority;

A statement that such authority is organized under this Article;

The names of the organizing political subdivisions; and

The names and addresses of the first members of the authority appointed by the organizing political subdivisions.

A certified copy of each of such resolutions signifying the determination to organize an authority under the provisions of this Article shall be filed with the Secretary of State of North Carolina, together with proof of publication of the notice of hearing on each of such resolutions. If the Secretary of State finds that the resolutions, including the articles of incorporation, conform to the provisions of this Article and that the notices of hearing were properly published, he shall file such resolutions and proofs of publication in his office and shall issue a certificate of incorporation under the seal of the State and shall record the same in an appropriate book of record in his office. The issuance of such certificate of incorporation by the Secretary of State shall constitute the authority a public body and body politic and corporate of the State of North Carolina. Said certificate of incorporation shall be conclusive evidence of the fact that such authority has been duly created and established under the provisions of this Article.

When the authority has been duly organized and its officers elected as herein provided the secretary of the authority shall certify to the Secretary of State the names and addresses of such officers as well as the address of the principal office of the authority.

History.

1955, c. 1195, s. 3; 1971, c. 892, s. 1; 1991, c. 516, s. 1; 2001-224, s. 1; 2002-76, s. 1.

§ 162A-3.1.
Alternative procedure for creation.

As an alternative to the procedure set forth in

G.S. 162A-3

, the governing body of a single county or the governing bodies of any two or more political subdivisions may by resolution signify their determination to organize an authority under the provisions of this section of this Article. Each of such resolutions shall be adopted after a public hearing thereon, notice of which hearing shall be given by publication at least once, not less than 10 days prior to the date fixed for such hearing, in a newspaper having a general circulation in the political subdivision. Such notice shall contain a brief statement of the substance of the proposed resolution, shall set forth the proposed articles of incorporation of the authority and shall state the time and place of the public hearing. No such political subdivision shall be required to make any other publication of such resolution under the provisions of any other law.

(a1)

If an authority is organized by three or more political subdivisions, it may include in its organization nonprofit water corporations. The board of directors of a nonprofit water corporation must signify the corporation’s determination to participate in the organization of the authority by adopting a resolution that meets the requirements of subsection (b) of this section. The nonprofit water corporation is not subject to the notice and public hearing requirements of subsection (a) of this section. For all other purposes of this Article, the nonprofit water corporation shall be considered to be a political subdivision.

(a2)

If an authority is organized by three or more political subdivisions, it may include in its organization the State of North Carolina. The State of North Carolina is not subject to the notice and public hearing requirements of subsection (a) of this section. For purposes of this Article, the State of North Carolina shall be a political subdivision and its governing body shall be the Council of State.

Each such resolution shall include articles of incorporation which shall set forth:

The name of the authority;

A statement that such authority is organized under this section of this Article;

The names of the organizing political subdivisions;

The names and addresses of the members of the authority appointed by the organizing political subdivisions; and

A statement that members of the authority will be limited to such members as may be appointed from time to time by the organizing political subdivisions.

A certified copy of each of such resolutions signifying the determination to organize an authority under the provisions of this section of this Article shall be filed with the Secretary of State of North Carolina, together with proof of publication of the notice of hearing on each of such resolutions. If the Secretary of State finds that the resolutions, including the articles of incorporation, conform to the provisions of this section of this Article and that the notices of hearing were properly published, he shall file such resolutions and proofs of publication in his office and shall issue a certificate of incorporation under the seal of the State and shall record the same in an appropriate book of record in his office. The issuance of such certificate of incorporation by the Secretary of State shall constitute the authority a public body and body politic and corporate of the State of North Carolina. Said certificate of incorporation shall be conclusive evidence of the fact that such authority has been duly created and established under the provisions of this section of this Article.

When the authority has been duly organized and its officers elected as herein provided the secretary of the authority shall certify to the Secretary of State the names and addresses of such officers as well as the address of the principal office of the authority.

History.

1975, c. 224, s. 1; 1991, c. 516, s. 2; 2001-224, s. 2; 2002-76, s. 2.

§ 162A-4.
Withdrawal from authority; joinder of new subdivision.

Whenever an authority has been organized under the provisions of this Chapter, any political subdivision may withdraw therefrom at any time prior to the creation of any obligations by the authority, and any political subdivision not having joined in the original organization may, with the consent of the authority, join the authority; provided, that any political subdivision not having joined the original organization shall have the right upon reasonable terms and conditions, whether the authority shall consent thereto or not, to join the authority if the authority’s water system or sewer system, or any part thereof is situated within the boundaries of the political subdivision or of the county within which the political subdivision is located; provided, further, that any political subdivision authorized to join the authority by

G.S. 162A-5.1

may do so without the consent of the authority.

Any political subdivision desiring to withdraw from or to join an existing authority shall signify its desire by resolution adopted after a public hearing thereon, notice of which hearing shall be given in the manner and at the time provided in

G.S. 162A-3

or 162A-3.1, as appropriate. Such notice shall contain a brief statement of the substance of said resolution and shall state the time and place of the public hearing to be held thereon. In the case of a political subdivision desiring to join the authority, the resolution shall set forth all of the information required under

G.S. 162A-3

or 162A-3.1, as appropriate, in connection with the original organization of the authority, including the name and address of the first member of the authority from the joining political subdivision if the authority was organized under G.S. 162A-3.

A certified copy of each such resolution signifying the desire of a political subdivision to withdraw from or to join an existing authority, together with proof of publication of the notice of hearing on each such resolution and, in cases where such resolution provides for the political subdivision joining the authority, certified copies of the resolution of the governing bodies creating the authority consenting to such joining shall be filed with the Secretary of State of North Carolina. If the Secretary of State finds that the resolutions conform to the provisions of this Article and that the notices of hearing were properly published, he shall file such resolutions and proofs of publication in his office and shall issue a certificate of withdrawal, or a certificate of joinder, as the case may be, and shall record the same in an appropriate book of record in his office. The withdrawal or joining shall become effective upon the issuance of such certificate, and such certificate shall be conclusive evidence thereof.

History.

1955, c. 1195, s. 4; 1969, c. 850; 1971, c. 892, s. 1; c. 1093, s. 6; 1975, c. 224, s. 2; 1995, c. 207, s. 2; c. 509, s. 135.2(c).

§ 162A-5.
Members of authority; organization; quorum.

Each authority organized under this Article shall consist of the number of members as may be agreed upon by the participating political subdivisions, such members to be selected by the respective political subdivision. A proportionate number (as nearly as can be) of members of the authority first appointed shall have terms expiring one year, two years and three years respectively from the date on which the creation of the authority becomes effective. Successor members and members appointed by a political subdivision subsequently joining the authority shall each be appointed for a term of three years, but any person appointed to fill the vacancy shall be appointed to serve only for the unexpired term and any member may be reappointed; provided, however, that a political subdivision subsequently joining an authority created under

G.S. 162A-3.1

, or under the provisions of

G.S. 162A-3

other than subsection (a1), shall not have the right to appoint any members to such authority. Appointments of successor members shall, in each instance, be made by the governing body of the political subdivision appointing the member whose successor is to be appointed. Any member of the authority may be removed, with or without cause, by the governing body appointing said member. This subsection does not apply in the case of an authority that a city joins under

G.S. 162A-5.1

.

Each authority organized under this Article that a city has joined under

G.S. 162A-5.1

shall consist of the number of members provided by that section, such members to be selected as provided by that section. Two each of the members of the authority first appointed after a city has joined under

G.S. 162A-5.1

shall have terms expiring one year and two years respectively from the date on which the certificate of joinder was issued, and three of the members of the authority first appointed after a city has joined under G.S. 162A-5.1 shall have terms expiring three years from the date on which the certificate of joinder was issued. Such designation shall be made by the authority by lot at the meeting where members take their oaths of office. Successor members shall each be appointed for a term of three years to commence on the day that the terms of the prior members’ terms expire, but any person appointed to fill a vacancy shall be appointed to serve only for the unexpired term and any member may be reappointed. Appointments of successor members shall, in each instance, be made by the governing body of the political subdivision appointing the member whose successor is to be appointed. Any member of the authority may be removed, with or without cause, by the governing body appointing said member.

Each member of the authority before entering upon his duties shall take and subscribe an oath or affirmation to support the Constitution of the United States and of this State and to discharge faithfully the duties of his office, and a record of each such oath shall be filed with the secretary of the authority.The authority shall select one of its members as chairman and another as vice-chairman and shall also select a secretary and a treasurer who may but need not be members of the authority. The offices of secretary and treasurer may be combined. The terms of office of the chairman, vice-chairman, secretary and treasurer shall be as provided in the bylaws of the authority.A majority of the members of the authority shall constitute a quorum and the affirmative vote of a majority of all of the members of the authority shall be necessary for any action taken by the authority. No vacancy in the membership of the authority shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all of the duties of the authority. The members of the authority may be paid a per diem compensation set by the authority which per diem may not exceed the total amount of four thousand dollars ($4,000) annually, and shall be reimbursed for the amount of actual expenses incurred by them in the performance of their duties.

History.

1955, c. 1195, s. 5; 1969, c. 850; 1971, c. 892, s. 1; 1975, c. 224, ss. 3, 4; 1995, c. 207, s. 3; 1999-456, s. 43; 2001-224, s. 2.1; 2005-127, s. 2; 2006-226, s. 29.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-127, s. 2, as amended by Session Laws 2006-226, s. 29, effective June 29, 2005, and applicable on the first day of the fiscal year of the authority that begins after that date, substituted “four thousand dollars ($4,000)” for “two thousand dollars ($2,000)” in the last paragraph of subsection (c).

§ 162A-5.1.
Political subdivision allowed to join certain authorities.

As used in this section, “city” means a city, town, or incorporated village.

When an authority was organized under

G.S. 162A-3.1

by one county and one city, and the majority of the authority’s water customers are located within a city which is not the city that was one of the two original organizers, then that city may join the authority and appoint members as provided by this section.

A city joining the authority under this section shall do so in accordance with the procedures of

G.S. 162A-4

. The resolution shall become effective upon the issuance of a certificate of joinder under

G.S. 162A-4

(c).

When a city joins an authority under this section, then effective on a date set in the resolution, but not earlier than the first day of the second calendar month after the issuance of the certificate of joinder under G.S. 162A-4(c), the terms of office of all the members of the authority are terminated, and the authority shall consist of members appointed as follows:

Two members appointed by the governing board of the city joining the authority under this section. These members must be residents of that city.

One member appointed by the governing board of the city that was one of the two original organizers. That member must be a resident of that city.

One member appointed by the board of commissioners of the county that was one of the two original organizers. This member must be a resident of a household served by the authority’s water system.

One member appointed by the board of commissioners of the county that was one of the two original organizers. This member must be a resident of a household served by a sewer system operated by the authority, but may not be a resident of a household served by the authority’s water system.

One member appointed by the board of commissioners of the county that was one of the two original organizers. This member must be a resident of a household served by the authority’s water system which is located outside the corporate limits of any municipality.

One member appointed by the board of commissioners of the county that was one of the two original organizers. That member must be a resident of the city that has the second highest number of residential water customers served by the authority.

History.

1995, c. 207, s. 1.